Vermont statutes. Title 22 Libraries, History, and Information Technology
Subchapter 3. Municipal Libraries

§ 141.
Establishment and maintenance.

A municipality may establish and maintain for the use of its residents public libraries.

A municipality may provide library services to the residents of other municipalities, upon terms to be agreed upon, and may annually contract with a library or library corporation to furnish library materials to its residents free of charge and may appropriate money for that purpose and may annually appropriate money for the maintenance, care, increase, and support of a library held in trust for the residents of the municipality.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 28

, § 10.

§ 142.
Appropriations.

A municipality establishing and maintaining a library or contracting for library services may appropriate money as necessary for suitable facilities and for the foundation of a public library and shall appropriate money annually for the maintenance, care, and increase of the library in an amount voted at its annual meeting.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 28

, § 11.

§ 143.
Trustees.

Unless a municipality which has established or shall establish a public library votes at its annual meeting to elect a board of trustees, the governing body of the municipality shall appoint the trustees. The appointment or election of the trustees shall continue in effect until changed at an annual meeting of the municipality. The board shall consist of not less than five trustees who shall have full power to manage the public library, make bylaws, elect officers, establish a library policy and receive, control and manage property which shall come into the hands of the municipality by gift, purchase, devise or bequest for the use and benefit of the library. The board may appoint a director for the efficient administration and conduct of the library.

When trustees are first chosen, they shall be elected or appointed for staggered terms.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 28

, § 12.

§ 144.
Annual report.

The trustees shall annually make a report to the annual meeting of the municipality of the condition of the library and of the management and expenditure of monies as have come into their hands.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 28

, § 13.

§ 145.
When no trustee elected or appointed.

When no trustees have been elected or appointed, monies raised for a library shall be paid out by an agent to be appointed by the governing body of the municipality until trustees are elected or appointed pursuant to section 143 of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 28

, § 14.

§ 146.
Public documents and volumes.

The governing body of the municipality may vote to place in the library a copy of any documents and volumes received by the municipality and also a copy of any documents and volumes received from the State, except library materials provided by law to be kept in the office of the town clerk, as it shall designate. These materials shall remain the property of the municipality, but their use shall be enjoyed by the library until the governing body votes otherwise.

The State Librarian shall deliver to a public library that has been voted the use of documents owned by the municipality, the duplicate documents and volumes published or provided by the State which, in the judgment of the Board of Libraries, can be delivered without prejudice to the Department of Libraries. The documents and volumes shall remain the property of the State, but the library shall use them until the State Librarian is directed by law to demand their return to the Department of Libraries.

When a public library exists in a municipality and is not established by it, the municipality may, at an annual meeting, by a two-thirds vote, make the provisions of subsection (a) of this section apply to the library; and, in case of such vote, the provisions of subsection (b) of this section shall apply to the library the same as if it were established and maintained by the municipality.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 28

, § 15.